Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-167] Process of military courts.
(a) Military courts may issue any process or mandate necessary to carry into
effect their powers. Such a court may issue subpoenas and subpoenas duces
tecum and enforce by attachment attendance of witnesses and production of books
and records, when it is sitting within the State and the witnesses, books, and
records sought are also so located.

(b) Process and mandates may be issued by
summary courts-martial, provost courts, or the president of other military courts
and may be directed to and may be executed by the marshals of the military
court or any peace officer and shall be in such form as may be prescribed by
rules issued under this chapter.

(c) All officers to whom process or mandates
may be so directed shall execute them and make return of their acts thereunder
according to the requirements of those documents. Except as otherwise
specifically provided in this chapter, no such officer may demand or require
payment of any fee or charge for receiving, executing, or returning such a
process or mandate or for any service in connection therewith. [L 1982, c 171,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next